Washington statutes.
RCW 13.20.030

Chair—Quorum—Organization—Rules of procedure.

The judicial member of the board shall be the chair thereof; a majority thereof shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; and the board shall have authority to organize itself in such manner and to establish such rules of procedure as it deems proper for the performance of its duties.

[ 2010 c 8 s 4004; 1955 c 232 s 3.]